Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3302
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 44-3301 to 44-3327, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance;

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Insurance;

(3) Insurer shall mean any person, as defined in section 49-801, authorized to conduct an insurance business as an insurer in this state, including corporations organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313; and

(4) Legal expense insurance shall mean the assumption of a contractual obligation to pay or reimburse for specified legal services or specified legal expenses, in consideration of a specified payment for an interval of time, regardless of whether the payment is made by the beneficiaries individually or by a third person for them, in such a manner that the total cost incurred by assuming the obligation is to be spread directly or indirectly among a group of persons. Legal expense insurance includes arrangements that create reasonable expectations of enforceable rights, but does not include the provision of or reimbursement for legal services incidental to other insurance coverages. The payment of only an administrative fee to an attorney shall not be considered payment or reimbursement for specified legal services or specified legal expenses for the purposes of this definition.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB26, § 1.